Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), the
following new or increased fees, adopted by the Department of Public Safety  Standards and
Training and approved by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, are approved:
(1) Alarm Monitor Private Security Professional Certification: $78
(2) Armed Private Security Professional Certification: $78
(3) Event and Entertainment Private Security Professional Certification: $78
(4) Unarmed Private Security Professional Certification: $78
(5) Private Security Firearms Instructor Certification: $108
(6) Alarm Monitor Private Security Instructor Certification: $108
(7) Unarmed Private Security Instructor Certification: $135
(8) Supervisory Manager License: $100
(9) Executive Manager License: $312
(10) Private Security Late Renewal Fee: $30
(11) Private Security Replacement Certification or License Fee: $24
(12) Private Security Armed Upgrade Fee: $25
(13) Private Investigator Late Renewal Fee: $30
(14) Private Investigator Replacement License Fee: $24
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 2